District of Columbia statutes.
44-301.02

Medicare not applicable.

(a)

The provisions of subchapter I of this chapter shall not apply in cases directly involving coverage determinations or benefit requirements under the federal Medicare program. The provisions of subchapters II and III of this chapter shall not apply in cases directly involving federal Medicare benefits.

(b)

Any complaint by a member involving coverage or benefits provided pursuant to the federal Medicare program shall be resolved in accordance with federal laws, regulations, and procedures established for fair hearings and appeals for the Medicare programs and with any appropriate District law.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-274, § 102, 46 DCR 1294

History

1981 Ed., § 32-571.2.

Prior Codifications